Utah statutes.
31A-22-637.   Health care provider payment information -- Notice of admissions.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "insurer" is as defined in Section 31A-22-636.

(2) (a)  An insurer shall provide its health care providers who are under contract with the insurer access to current information necessary for the health care provider to determine:

(i)  the effect of procedure codes on payment or compensation before a claim is submitted for a procedure;

(ii)  the plans and carrier networks that the health care provider is subject to as part of the contract with the carrier; and

(iii)  in accordance with Subsection 31A-26-301.6(10)(f), the specific rate and terms under which the provider will be paid for health care services.

(b)  The information required by Subsection (2)(a) may be provided through a website, and if requested by the health care provider, notice of the updated website shall be provided by the carrier.

(3) (a)  An insurer shall not require a health care provider by contract, reimbursement procedure, or otherwise to notify the insurer of a hospital in-patient emergency admission within a period of time that is less than one business day of the hospital in-patient admission, if compliance with the notification requirement would result in notification by the health care provider on a weekend or federal holiday.

(b)  Subsection (3)(a) does not prohibit the applicability or administration of other contract provisions between an insurer and a health care provider that require pre-authorization for scheduled in-patient admissions.

